Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1144
District; failure to carry out responsibilities; hearing; procedure.

If at any time after January 1, 1988, it is alleged by the department upon its own initiative or as a result of a complaint being filed with the department that a district is not carrying out its responsibilities under the Nebraska Chemigation Act, the department may hold a contested case hearing. Notice of such hearing shall be published in such newspapers as are necessary to provide for general circulation within the district at least once each week for three consecutive weeks, the last publication to be not less than seven days prior to the hearing. The notice shall inform the public as to the reasons for such hearing. The director shall receive evidence from all interested parties at the hearing. Each hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be recorded, and such record shall be available for review.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 44.